apertium-eng.eng.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
<alphabet>abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyzABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWZYX</alphabet>
	<sdefs>
		<sdef n="n"/>
		<sdef n="sg"/>
		<sdef n="pl"/>
	</sdefs>
	<pardefs>
		<pardef n="gramophone__n">
			<e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>s</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
		<pardef n="source__n">
			<e><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
			<e><p><l>s</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		</pardef>
	</pardefs>
	<section id="main" type="standard">
		<e lm="gramophone"><i>gramophone</i><par n="gramophone__n"/></e>
		<e lm="source"><i>source</i><par n="source__n"/></e>
	</section>
</dictionary>
